South Dakota, session 2026, HB1251.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF SOUTH DAKOTA:
Section 1. That § 4-7-31 be AMENDED:
4-7-31. There is hereby established within the state treasury the budget reserve
fund. Expenditures from the fund may occur only by special appropriation of the
Legislature and may redress only unforeseen expenditure obligations or unforeseen
revenue shortfalls, as may constitute an emergency pursuant to S.D. Const., Art. III, § 1.
Section 2. That § 4-7-32 be AMENDED:
4-7-32. The transfer of all prior year unobligated cash must occur in accordance
with this section:
(1) On July first of each fiscal year or at such the time that the prior fiscal year general
fund ending unobligated cash balance is determined, the commissioner of the
Bureau of Finance and Management shall transfer all prior year unobligated cash,
up to an amount equal to equaling ten percent of the general fund appropriations
from the general appropriation act for the prior fiscal year, into the budget reserve
fund. In no event shall the The cash balance in the budget reserve fund be greater
than may not exceed ten percent of the general fund appropriations from the
general appropriation act for the prior fiscal year.
Expenditures out of the budget reserve fund shall only be by special appropriation of the
Legislature and shall only redress such unforeseen expenditure obligations or such
Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.

1251C 2 1251
unforeseen revenue shortfalls as may constitute an emergency pursuant to S.D.
Const., Art. III, § 1.; and
(2) If any unobligated cash balance remains after the requirements of subdivision (1)
are met, the commissioner must transfer:
(a) Thirty percent of the remaining balance to the community-based providers
methodology supplement fund, created in section 4 of this Act;
(b) Thirty percent of the remaining balance to the target teacher salary
supplement fund, created in section 3 of this Act; and
(c) Forty percent of the remaining balance to the general revenue replacement
fund, created in § 4-7-45.
Section 3. That a NEW SECTION be added to chapter 13-13:
There is created in the state treasury the target teacher salary supplement fund.
The fund consists of moneys specified for deposit in the fund pursuant to § 4-7-32. The
Department of Education shall administer the fund. The purpose of the fund is to enable
an increase to the target teacher salary, as set forth in § 13-13-10.1.
The department, as part of the annual budget submission, in accordance with § 4-
7-7, shall submit a budget request utilizing money from the fund to provide an increase
in the target teacher salary, as set forth in § 13-13-10.1.
Interest on moneys credited to the fund must remain in the fund.
Expenditures from the fund must be budgeted through the general appropriation
bill.
Section 4. That a NEW SECTION be added to chapter 28-22:
There is created in the state treasury the community-based providers methodology
supplement fund. The fund consists of moneys specified for deposit in the fund pursuant
to § 4-7-32. The Department of Human Services and the Department of Social Services
shall each administer that portion of the fund to be used by the agency for the purpose of
enabling an increase in the rates payable to the types of community-based providers listed
in § 28-22-6, in order for the rate methodology of each provider to be closer to one
hundred percent of the methodology established in chapter 28-22.
Each department, as part of the annual budget submission, in accordance with § 4-
7-7, shall submit a budget request utilizing money from the fund to provide a uniform
increase in rates for community-based providers and specify the percentage of
methodology each community-based provider is to be at with the change.
Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.

1251C 3 1251
Interest on moneys credited to the fund must remain in the fund.
Expenditures from the fund must be budgeted through the general appropriation
bill.
Section 5. That § 4-7-39 be REPEALED.
The commissioner of the Bureau of Finance and Management shall transfer any
unobligated cash remaining after the transfer into the budget reserve fund as required by
§ 4-7-32 into the general revenue replacement fund if the amount in the general revenue
replacement fund does not exceed fifteen percent of the general fund appropriations in
the General Appropriations Act for the previous fiscal year.
Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.